South Carolina, session 2025-2026, H3254.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: Special examinations, waivers SECTION 1.    Section 40-47-32(E) of the S.C. Code is amended to read: (E)(1) The additional examination required pursuant to subsection (D) must be waived if the applicant is to practice in a position within the South Carolina Department of Corrections, the South Carolina Department of Health and Environmental Control, the South Carolina Department of Mental Health, the South Carolina Department of Disabilities and Special Needs, or the Disability Determination Services Unit of the State Agency of Vocational Rehabilitation. A license issued pursuant to this waiver is immediately invalid if the individual leaves that position or acts outside the scope of employment within the department. A change in agency may be approved upon presentation to the board of a copy of a contract in which the individual has been offered a position within the South Carolina Department of Corrections, the South Carolina Department of Health and Environmental Control, the South Carolina Department of Mental Health, the South Carolina Department of Disabilities and Special Needs, or the Disability Determination Services Unit of the State Agency of Vocational Rehabilitation. (2) The additional examination required pursuant to subsection (D) may be waived if the board determines the applicant possesses the requisite general medical knowledge to competently practice medicine. In making this determination, the board shall make findings of fact concerning the education and experience of the applicant. Time effective SECTION 2.    This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. Ratified the 5th day of March, 2026. Approved the 9th day of March, 2026. __________